test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_21_aika_gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aika - ok : # Noun 'tid' - ok
     aika+N+Sg+Nom: aika
     aika+N+Sg+Gen: aian
     aika+N+Sg+Par: aikaa
     aika+N+Sg+Tra: aiaksi
     aika+N+Sg+Abe: aiatta
     aika+N+Sg+Ine: aiassa
     aika+N+Sg+Ela: aiasta
     aika+N+Sg+Ill: aikhaan
     aika+N+Sg+Ade: aiala
     aika+N+Sg+Abl: aialta
     aika+N+Sg+All: aiale
     aika+N+Sg+Ess: aikana
     aika+N+Pl+Nom: aiat
     aika+N+Pl+Gen: aioitten
     aika+N+Pl+Par: aikoja
     aika+N+Pl+Tra: aioiksi
     aika+N+Pl+Abe: aioitta
     aika+N+Pl+Ine: aioissa
     aika+N+Pl+Ela: aioista
     aika+N+Pl+Ill: aikhoin
     aika+N+Pl+Ade: aioila
     aika+N+Pl+Abl: aioilta
     aika+N+Pl+All: aioile
     aika+N+Pl+Ess: aikoina
     aika+N+Pl+Com: aikoine
